Connecticut, session 2026, HB05565.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) There is established a working group
2 to study the civil and criminal laws of this state. Such study shall
3 include, at a minimum, a review of titles 46b, 51, 52, 53, 53a and 54 of
4 the general statutes for the purpose of recommending legislative
5 changes to said titles. The working group shall consist of the following
6 members who have expertise in laws of this state: (1) One appointed by
7 the speaker of the House of Representatives; (2) one appointed by the
8 president pro tempore of the Senate; (3) one appointed by the majority
9 leader of the House of Representatives; (4) one appointed by the
10 majority leader of the Senate; (5) one appointed by the minority leader
11 of the House of Representatives; and (6) one appointed by the minority
12 leader of the Senate. The administrative staff of the joint standing
13 committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
14 relating to the judiciary shall serve as the administrative staff for the
HB5565 / File No. 601 1

HB5565 File No. 601
15 working group. Not later than January 1, 2027, the working group shall
16 submit a report on its findings and recommendations to the joint
17 standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
18 matters relating to the judiciary, in accordance with the provisions of
19 section 11-4a of the general statutes. The working group shall terminate
20 on the date that it submits such report or January 1, 2027, whichever is
21 later.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
JUD Joint Favorable
HB5565 / File No. 601 2

HB5565 File No. 601
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill creates a working group to study civil and criminal laws
resulting in no fiscal impact to the state because the working group has
the expertise needed to meet the requirements of the bill.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5565 / File No. 601 3

HB5565 File No. 601
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5565
AN ACT CONCERNING A STUDY OF THE CIVIL AND CRIMINAL
LAWS OF THIS STATE.